Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ANONYMOUS THREAT REPORTING SYSTEM GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, in consultation with the Minnesota School Safety Center, to issue anonymous threat reporting system grants to school districts, charter schools, cooperative units, or Tribal contract schools. new text end new text begin (b) A school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, or a Tribal contract school may apply for a grant in the form and manner specified by the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management. The Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management may establish grant application timelines and may award grants in more than one round. Grants may be awarded in an amount not to exceed $....... per district, charter school, cooperative unit, or Tribal contract school. Grants are contingent on recipients providing at least a 50-percent match from nonstate funds in accordance with paragraph (c). Grants must be awarded to schools located in all geographic regions of the state with at least half of the grants awarded to school districts, charter schools, cooperative units, and Tribal contract schools with administrative offices located outside of the 11-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (c) Grant funds may be used to fund expenses associated with the development, purchase, implementation, operation, and maintenance of an anonymous threat reporting system, including staff compensation. Grant funds may also be used to compensate staff who are responsible for responding to threats received through the system. new text end new text begin (d) Before a grant is awarded, the district, charter school, cooperative unit, or Tribal contract school must provide documentation acceptable to the director of the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management on how the grant will be used, including identification of how staff will be responsible for responding to threats received through the anonymous threat reporting system. new text end new text begin (e) The Department of Public Safety may retain up to ten percent of the appropriation for the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management to administer the grants and for the Minnesota School Safety Center to provide technical assistance to districts, charter schools, cooperative units, and Tribal contract schools. new text end new text begin (f) By February 15 following each year a grant is awarded under this section, the Minnesota School Safety Center, Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, and Department of Public Safety must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and public safety on how grant money was awarded and distributed. The report must identify the grant recipients and how the grant money was used by each recipient. new text end new text begin (g) This is a onetime appropriation. This appropriation does not cancel but is available until June 30, 2028. new text end